tests/test_files/apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON A6                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without comparative reading,
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                           !# example 1
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# example 2
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                     !# example 3

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Don't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION (V-INFL-COMMON)

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

! Pointed to by: V-PERS-S1 and V-PERS-AOR
! Irregular p1.sg form is in V-PERS-AOR

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Алма театрға бара<aor><p3><sg> ма? – Алма в театр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;                ! Dir/LR

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-QST ;

%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT-QST ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASES ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

!! LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST
!! 
!! !%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! %<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! !%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!! !%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2014-08-16//FMT: this was "GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST"

LEXICON GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<gen%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2015-01-18//JNW: added <nom>, since it needs a case for transfer, and no other cases are ever added, or even presumed by the transducer to be okay.  But worth CHECK ing..
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}с V-PERS-S1 ;

%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}% емес V-PERS-S1 ;

%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% емес V-PERS-S1 ;  ! more colloquial than regular negative

%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жоқ V-PERS-S1 ;    ! more colloquial than regular negative


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;      ! Dir/LR - see irregular forms above
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;        ! Dir/LR - see irregular forms above
%<pih%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-PERS-S1 ;

%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%{E%}д%{I%}% екен V-PERS-S1 ;    ! барады екенмін / бармайды екенмін
%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% екен V-PERS-S1 ;   ! барған екенмін / бармаған екенмін
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;         ! барыппын / бармаппын
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;    ! бопты   ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жоқ% екен V-PERS-S1 ; ! барған жоқ екенмін

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;            ! Dir/LR
       ! for things like боп, сап, кеп, қап, қып, etc.
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}ш%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;           ! Dir/LR
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

!%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с # ; FIXME looks wrong

! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;  ! FIXME: check that e.g. no possession + accusative isn't valid (I think it is) -JNW
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ger_obs%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
! FIXME <ger_obs>:
! - does it have a negative form?  if regular, with -МА,
!   put in the REGULAR_NEGATIVE category
! - does it take possessive forms?  if not, change
!   continuation lexicon to something other than GER-INFL

 LEXICON Adjectives
біржақты:біржақты A6 ; ! "" ! probably A6 not A1: no comp forms?
біртүрлі:біртүрлі A6 ; ! "" ! probably A6 not A1: no comp forms?
мәңгі:мәңгі A6 ; ! "eternal" ! A6 not A1: no comp forms
мол:мол A6 ; ! "aplenty"?  ! FIXME: check POS and translation ! A6 not A1 because no comparative forms (at least occasional advl and subst)
тікелей:тікелей A6 ; ! "direct(ly), immediate(ly)"  A6 not A1 because no comp readings -JNW
уақытша:уақытша A6 ; ! "for the time being" ! Probably A6, not A1 -JNW
бекер:бекер A6 ; ! "vain, for nothing"
 LEXICON Verbs
сал%<vaux%>%<ger%>:салыш GER-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Guesser
мемлекеттік:мемлекеттік A6 ; ! "governmental"
